Hawaii statutes.
§291-31.5 Blue lights prohibited for
motor vehicles, motorcycles, motor scooters, bicycles, mopeds. (a) No
person shall knowingly operate, affix or cause to be affixed, display, or
possess any lamp, reflector, or illumination device that appears to be the
color blue, or colors blue and red, upon any motor vehicle, motorcycle, motor
scooter, bicycle, or moped except for:

(1) County law enforcement vehicles authorized and
approved by the chief of police of the county in which the vehicle is operated;

(2) Department of public safety law enforcement
vehicles with blue and red lamps, reflectors, or illumination devices
authorized and approved by the director of public safety; or

(3) Department of land and natural resources division
of conservation and resources enforcement vehicles with blue and red lamps,
reflectors, or illumination devices authorized and approved by the chairperson
of the board of land and natural resources.

This prohibition shall not apply to
factory-installed instrument illumination.

(b) Any violation of this section shall be
punished by a fine not exceeding $1,000, or by imprisonment not exceeding one
year, or both. [L 1985, c 182, §1; am L 1991, c 210, §1; am L 2007, c 109, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next